Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Charter Form of Government

5-1-201. Purpose — Construction.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent and purpose of this part to provide for the right to charter for counties as an alternate form of county government.

This part shall be liberally construed as a utilization of the constitutional power granted by amendment to the Constitution of Tennessee, article VII, § 1 approved at an election on March 7, 1978.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-121.

Cross-References. Local enterprise zones, title 13, ch. 28, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Transfer of duties of Knox County circuit court clerk, OAG 00-041, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (3/13/00).

Altering term of county assessor. OAG 11-38, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (4/26/11).

Officers under county charter. OAG 12-103, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (11/2/12).

Members of a county legislative body can establish partisan caucuses for the purpose of outlining and meeting party objectives and goals but meetings of a partisan caucus of a county legislative body may be subject to the Open Meetings Act. OAG 14-96, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (10/30/14).

5-1-202. Charter adoption — Effect on existing offices, etc. — Effect on constitutional officers.

After adoption of a charter pursuant to this part, no right, power, duty, obligation or function of any officer, agency or office of such county shall be retained and continued unless this part or the charter of such county expressly so provides, or unless such retention and continuation be required by the Constitution of Tennessee.

The adoption of a charter shall not have the effect of removing the incumbent from any county office or abridging the term or altering the salary prior to the end of the term for which such public officer was elected.

No charter, whether existing or adopted after May 22, 2019, may be interpreted or amended to alter, amend, or reduce the duties, qualifications, or privileges of the constitutional county offices of sheriff, register, county clerk, assessor of property, or trustee in a manner inconsistent with the laws of this state; provided, that a charter may increase the duties of such offices in a manner consistent with the laws of this state. This subsection (c) must not be construed to affect the terms of the constitutional county offices of sheriff, register, county clerk, assessor of property, or trustee.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 2; T.C.A., § 5-122; Acts 2019, ch. 458, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 458, § 2. May 22, 2019.

Cross-References. Charter adoption, rights preserved, § 5-1-212.

5-1-203. Authority to adopt charter form.

Each county in this state may adopt a charter form of government as provided in this part.

Such charter when complete shall result in the creation and establishment of an alternate form of county government to perform all the governmental and corporate functions previously performed by the county.

Such charter form of government shall replace the existing form if approved by a majority of the voters in a referendum.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 3; T.C.A., § 5-123.

5-1-204. Charter commission — Creation.

The initial step in a charter form of county government shall be the creation of a charter commission.

The charter commission may be created by the adoption of a charter resolution by the legislative body of a county.

Such resolution shall be adopted by a majority of all members constituting such legislative body, and not by merely a majority of the quorum at any regular meeting or at any meeting specially called to consider such resolution.

Such resolution shall provide that a charter commission is established to propose to the people an alternative form of county government to perform all of the governmental and corporate functions of the county.

Such resolution shall provide that an election shall be held to select members of the charter commission.

Members of the charter commission shall be elected from the same districts and in the same manner as the members of the county legislative body. No more than three (3) members of the charter commission shall be elected from any one (1) district.

A copy of the resolution providing for an election to select members of the charter commission shall be certified by the county clerk to the county election commission, together with certificates as to the fact and date of adoption, and thereupon an election shall be held as provided in § 5-1-205.

Alternatively, the charter commission may be created by proclamation of the county mayor.

Such proclamation shall be ratified by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all members constituting the county legislative body, and not by merely a majority of the quorum at any regular meeting or at any meeting specially called to consider such proclamation.

Such proclamation shall provide that a charter commission is established to propose to the people an alternative form of county government to perform all of the governmental and corporate functions of the county.

Such proclamation shall also identify and appoint the individual members of the charter commission.

Members of the charter commission shall be appointed from the same districts as members of the county legislative body are elected. No more than three (3) members of the charter commission shall be appointed from any one (1) district.

This subsection (c) shall not apply in counties having a population of:

not less than nor more than

4,300 4,400

4,500 4,600

6,125 6,225

7,650 7,700

9,350 9,400

13,565 13,600

14,925 14,940

15,675 15,775

19,500 19,575

26,400 26,500

31,900 32,000

32,600 32,700

38,300 38,315

47,575 47,615

143,900 144,000

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

A charter resolution creating a charter commission may be initiated by petition of the voters in the following manner:

The petition shall be addressed to the county legislative body requesting that a charter commission be created, and it shall state the number of members to be elected as members of such commission;

The petition shall state the number of members to be elected from each of the same districts as members of the county legislative body. No more than three (3) members of the charter commission shall be elected from any one (1) district;

The petition shall be signed by at least a number of registered voters in the county equal to ten percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in such county for governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election;

The petition requesting such resolution shall be filed with the county clerk and a photographic copy of the petition shall be filed at the same time with the county election commission, which shall be the judge of the sufficiency of the petition.

The county election commission shall hold an election on the charter resolution, as in subsection (b).

A charter commission may be created in any county in the manner prescribed by private act of the general assembly.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to affect the judicial system in any county adopting a charter form of government except as its charter or ordinances may direct the imposing, levying or collection of fines, penalties, fees or court costs or the procedures for the filling of vacancies as required by law.

This subsection (f) shall not apply to counties with a population of not less than two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) nor more than two hundred ninety thousand (290,000), based upon the 1980 federal census.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-124; Acts 1983, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 763, § 1; 1984, ch. 905, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Shelby County ordinance creating private right of action for civil rights violations. OAG 12-73, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (7/19/12).

Once elected, members of a charter commission have a duty to prepare and file a charter for consideration by the people. The applicable statutes place no limits on a county legislative body’s authority to extend the time a charter commission has to prepare and file its proposed charter. State law does not provide any other specific remedies for a charter commission’s failure to fulfill its duty, but a county legislative body has some implied authority over the continued existence of the commission. OAG 18-36, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (7/30/2018).

5-1-205. Charter commission — Election of members.

Upon the adoption of a charter resolution by the legislative body of a county or by petition of the voters, which resolution provides for an election of the members of a charter commission, it shall be the duty of the county election commission to call an election to elect members of the charter commission, such election to be held concurrently with the next primary or general election in the county occurring seventy-five (75) days or more after such resolution is adopted or otherwise becomes effective.

The cost of the election shall be paid out of the county funds.

The number of candidates in each district receiving the highest total vote in such election, as specified in such resolution, shall be elected as members of the charter commission.

Any qualified voter of the county shall be eligible for election as a member of such charter commission.

The deadline for filing nominating petitions for candidates for the charter commission shall be no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the date established in § 2-5-101. For any election of charter commission members held within the year 2010, the candidates for the office shall qualify by filing all nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fifty-fifth day before the election, and candidates must withdraw no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fifty-second day before the election.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 5; T.C.A., § 5-125; Acts 2010, ch. 948, § 1.

5-1-206. Charter commission — Meetings — Organization — Staff.

The members of the charter commission shall hold an organizational meeting at the courthouse at ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) on the fifth weekday following their certification of election or, alternatively, as the case may be, on the fifth weekday following ratification by the county legislative body of the proclamation providing for their appointment, or at such subsequent date and place as a majority of the members may choose.

The charter commission shall elect a chair, chair pro tempore, a secretary, and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

The charter commission shall be authorized to employ such staff as may be required to assist it in drafting a charter for an alternate form of county government to be proposed for adoption.

Members of the charter commission shall not receive per diem or other compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for actual expenses.

The staff employed by such commission shall be paid compensation as determined by such charter commission within the limits of funds available to it under this part.

Any vacancy in the office of charter commissioner shall be filled by an election of a new member by the county legislative body.

All meetings of the charter commission shall be held in compliance with title 8, chapter 44.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 6; T.C.A., § 5-126; Acts 1983, ch. 422, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The alternate meeting time provided for in subsection (a) applies only in those counties to which § 5-1-204(c) applies.

5-1-207. Charter commission — Appropriations — Assistance of public officials.

Whenever any charter commission is established, it shall be the duty of the legislative body of the county to appropriate sufficient funds to defray the expenses of such commission, which appropriation shall be not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Such funds shall be disbursed by the county mayor or other fiscal officer of the county upon vouchers or warrants signed by the chair and the secretary of such commission.

All public officials shall, upon request, furnish the commission with all information and assistance necessary or appropriate for its work.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 7; T.C.A., § 5-127; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. A county charter commission is not authorized to use public funds to advocate adoption of the charter county form of government in an upcoming referendum. OAG 12-86, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (9/11/12).

5-1-208. Charter commission — Duties.

Each charter commission shall prepare and file the charter proposed by it not later than nine (9) months after the date of its initial meeting, or within such extended limit of time as may be authorized by resolution of the legislative body of the county.

The chair of the charter commission shall certify and file copies of such proposed charter with the county clerk and with the county election commission. Such copies shall be public records, available for inspection or examination by any interested person. Such charter commission shall also furnish or make available to every daily or weekly newspaper published in the county a complete copy of such charter.

Such charter commission shall take such other steps within the limitation of its available funds as it deems reasonable and appropriate to inform the public throughout the county of the contents of the proposed charter, and the same may be published or summarized in pamphlets and booklets to be made available for general distribution.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 8; T.C.A., § 5-128.

Attorney General Opinions. A county charter commission is not authorized to use public funds to advocate adoption of the charter county form of government in an upcoming referendum. OAG 12-86, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (9/11/12).

Once elected, members of a charter commission have a duty to prepare and file a charter for consideration by the people. The applicable statutes place no limits on a county legislative body’s authority to extend the time a charter commission has to prepare and file its proposed charter. State law does not provide any other specific remedies for a charter commission’s failure to fulfill its duty, but a county legislative body has some implied authority over the continued existence of the commission. OAG 18-36, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (7/30/2018).

5-1-209. Charter referendum.

After a copy of the proposed charter has been certified to the county election commission, as provided in § 5-1-208, it shall be the duty of the county election commission to hold a referendum election for the ratification or rejection of the proposed charter.

The ballots used in the election shall have printed on them a brief summary of the proposed charter as required by § 2-5-208(f). The ballots shall be prepared so as to provide a choice for voters as follows:

For a charter form of county government .

Against a charter form of county government .

The referendum election shall be held at the time of the next general election. Notice of the referendum election shall be given as required in other elections on questions submitted to the vote of the people.

The proposed charter shall be deemed ratified and adopted if it is approved by a majority of those voting in the referendum.

The returns of the referendum election shall be certified by the county election commission to the secretary of state, together with a copy of the charter previously filed with such county election commission by the charter commission.

Thereupon, the secretary of state shall issue a proclamation showing the result of such election on the adoption or rejection of the proposed charter, one (1) copy of which proclamation shall be attached to the copy of the charter theretofore certified to the secretary of state and one (1) copy of which shall be delivered to the county clerk, who shall attach the same to the copy of the charter theretofore certified to such county clerk.

Whenever a charter form of county government has been adopted, such two (2) certified copies with proclamations attached thereto shall be deemed duplicate original copies of the charter of such government.

The certified copy of the charter and proclamation deposited with the county clerk shall subsequently be delivered by such county clerk to such officer of the county government as the charter may direct.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-129.

Collateral References.

Interplay between Twenty-First Amendment and Commerce Clause concerning state regulation of intoxicating liquors. 116 A.L.R.5th 149.

5-1-210. Charter contents.

The proposed county charter shall provide:

For the creation of an alternative form of county government vested with any and all powers that counties are, or may hereafter be, authorized or required to exercise under the Constitution and general laws of the state, and any and all powers and duties of such county that are required or authorized by private acts effective on the date of ratification of such charter, as fully and completely as though the powers were specifically enumerated therein;

That such chartered county government shall be a public corporation, with perpetual succession, capable of suing and being sued, and capable of purchasing, receiving and holding property, real and personal, and of selling, leasing or disposing of the same to the extent as other counties;

For a county legislative body, which shall be the legislative body of the county and shall be given all the authority and functions of the legislative body of the county being chartered, with such exceptions and with such additional authority as may be specified elsewhere in this part;

For the size, method of election, qualification for holding office, method of removal, and procedures of the county legislative body with such other provisions with respect to such body as are normally related to the organization, powers and duties of governing bodies in counties;

For the assignment of administrative and executive functions to officers of the county government, which officers may be given, subject to such limitations as may be deemed appropriate or necessary, all or any part of the administrative and executive functions possessed by the county being chartered and such additional powers and duties, not inconsistent with general law or the Constitution of Tennessee;

For the names or titles of the administrative and executive officers of the county government, their qualifications, compensation, method of selection, tenure, removal, replacement and such other provisions with respect to such officers, not inconsistent with general law, as may be deemed necessary or appropriate for the county government;

For such administrative departments, agencies, boards and commissions as may be necessary and appropriate to perform the functions of county government in an efficient and coordinated manner and for this purpose for the alteration or abolition of existing county offices, departments, boards, commissions, agencies and functions, except where otherwise provided in this part or prohibited by the Constitution of Tennessee;

For the maintenance and administration of an effective civil service system and of county employees' retirement and pension systems and the regulation of such systems; provided, that nothing in this part or in a charter adopted pursuant to this part shall impair or diminish the rights and privileges of the existing employees under civil service or in the existing county employees' retirement and pension systems. Nothing in this subdivision (8) shall be construed to require any county to establish a civil service system or to establish and maintain its own retirement and pension system in the adoption of a charter form of county government;

For the method and procedure by which such charter may subsequently be amended; provided, that no such amendment shall be effective until submitted to the qualified voters of the county and approved by a majority of those voters voting thereon;

For such procedures, methods and steps as are determined to be necessary or appropriate to effectuate a transition from the existing county government to the chartered form of county government;

Such terms and provisions as are contained in any private act with respect to any county owned utility supported by its own revenues and operated, administered and managed pursuant to such private act; provided, that such terms and provisions of the charter may subsequently be amended pursuant to subdivision (9); and

That the duties of the constitutional county officers as prescribed by the general assembly shall not be diminished under a county charter form of government; provided, that such officers may be given additional duties under such charters.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 10; T.C.A., § 5-130.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — State Constitution of Tennessee — Term Limits in a County Charter Authorized under Tennessee Code Annotated Section 5-1-210(4) and Article VII, Section 1 of the Tennessee Constitution, 74 Tenn L. Rev. 421 (2007).

Attorney General Opinions. School board elections subject to general law, OAG 97-132, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (9/23/97).

Altering term of county assessor. OAG 11-38, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (4/26/11).

A county charter commission is not authorized to use public funds to advocate adoption of the charter county form of government in an upcoming referendum. OAG 12-86, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (9/11/12).

Officers under county charter. OAG 12-103, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (11/2/12).

5-1-211. Chartered counties — Ordinances.

The legislative body of each county that adopts a charter form of county government may pass ordinances relating to purely county affairs, but such ordinances shall not be opposed to the general laws and shall not interfere with the local affairs of any municipality within the limit of such county.

Each county government created and established pursuant to this part is empowered to set maximum monetary penalties and forfeitures up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for violation of county ordinances. In counties with a population of over seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1990 federal census, no fine over fifty dollars ($50.00) is allowed unless the ordinance permitting such is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county commission.

Every ordinance shall be read on three (3) different days in open session of the legislative body before its adoption, and not less than one (1) week shall elapse between first and third readings, and any ordinance not so read shall be null and void. Such county may establish by ordinance a procedure to read the caption of an ordinance on the first and second readings and an ordinance in its entirety on the third reading; provided, that for any ordinance that is longer than two (2) typewritten pages, the county may adopt a procedure to read a summary of the ordinance in lieu of reading the entire ordinance. Copies of such ordinances shall be available during regular business hours at the office of the county clerk and during sessions in which the ordinance has its second and third readings.

Unless prohibited by its charter, the county legislative body of a county that has a charter form of county government may by ordinance require every ordinance to be read on two (2) different days in open session of the legislative body before its adoption, and not less than one (1) week shall elapse between first and second readings, and any ordinance not so read shall be null and void. Such county may establish by ordinance a procedure to read the caption of an ordinance on the first reading and an ordinance in its entirety on the second reading; provided, that for any ordinance that is longer than two (2) typewritten pages, the county may adopt a procedure to read a summary of the ordinance in lieu of reading the entire ordinance. Copies of such ordinances shall be available during regular business hours at the office of the county clerk and during sessions in which the ordinance has its second reading.

An ordinance shall not take effect until fifteen (15) days after its passage, except in case of an emergency ordinance.

An emergency ordinance may become effective upon the day of its final passage; provided, that it shall contain the statement that an emergency exists and shall specify with distinctness the facts and reasons constituting such an emergency.

The unanimous vote of all members of the legislative body present shall be required to pass an emergency ordinance.

No ordinance making a grant, renewal or extension of a franchise or other special privilege, or regulating the rate to be charged for its service by any public utility shall ever be passed as an emergency ordinance.

No ordinance shall be amended except by a new ordinance.

In all ordinances adopted under subsections (c) and (d), the vote shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting for or against an ordinance shall be entered upon the journal.

The county clerk shall number and compile in an ordinance book all ordinances and shall preserve such book in the county clerk's office.

After passage all ordinances of a penal nature shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, and no such ordinance shall take effect prior to its publication.

Ordinances shall be enforced by the chief law enforcement officer of the county, unless an ordinance otherwise provides.

Persons charged with violation of an ordinance in whole or in part shall be tried in the court of general sessions. Any fines collected for such violation shall be paid into the county general fund unless the ordinance otherwise provides.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 11; T.C.A., § 5-131; Acts 1988, ch. 645, § 1; 1992, ch. 681, § 1; 1993, ch. 186, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Banning smoking in a public building, OAG 97-058, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/29/97).

Applicability of county civil service ordinance to employees of elected county officials, OAG 99-059, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (3/10/99).

Officers under county charter. OAG 12-103, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (11/2/12).

5-1-212. Charter adoption — Rights, etc., preserved.

The creation and establishment of a charter form of county government pursuant to this part shall not alter or change zoning regulations effective in the county, but the same shall continue until modified or changed by the county legislative body acting under authority granted in the charter.

Nothing in the charter of a county shall be construed to abolish, limit or abrogate any rights, privileges, duties or liabilities created by contract with the existing form of county government prior to the adoption of the county charter.

Nothing in the charter of a county shall be construed to abolish, limit or abrogate any rights of or against the county existing prior to the adoption of the county charter.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 12; T.C.A., § 5-132.

Cross-References. Charter adoption, effect on existing offices, etc., § 5-1-202.

5-1-213. Chartered counties — Privilege taxes.

Each county government created and established pursuant to this part shall be authorized and empowered to levy within its area any and every privilege tax that a county is now authorized to levy or may hereafter be authorized to levy.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 13; T.C.A., § 5-133.

5-1-214. Charter adoption — Effective date.

If a charter is approved as provided in § 5-1-209, the charter form of government shall take effect in the county on September 1 of the year in which the terms of the incumbent members of the county legislative body expire; provided, that such referendum shall have been held at least eighty (80) days prior to such date.

Acts 1979, ch. 402, § 14; T.C.A., § 5-134.

5-1-215. Financial policy on debt required for certain counties.

The county legislative body of any county having a charter form of government that has a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall adopt a financial policy establishing guidelines and goals in regard to the amount and type of debt issued by or on behalf of such county. Such policy shall be adopted within one (1) year from May 30, 2001.

Acts 2001, ch. 326, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.